Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
635

TRIALS

Section

635-1, 2 Repealed

635-3 Dismissal for want of prosecution

635-4 Repealed

Right of Trial by Jury; Functions of Court
and Jury;

Verdict

635-11 Repealed

635-12 No jury, when

635-13 Jury, when of right

635-14 Reference

635-15 to 19 Repealed

635-20 Less than unanimous verdict authorized

Impaneling, Segregation of Jury

635-26 Impaneling

635-27 Examination for cause

635-28 Challenging for cause

635-29 Challenging peremptorily

635-30 Peremptory challenges, criminal cases

635-31 Repealed

635-32 Segregation during trial

Instructions, Procedure Relating to

635-41 to 44 Repealed

Argument

635-51 Repealed

635-52 Scope of argument

New Trial

635-56 Grounds for new trial

635-57 Repealed

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

Law Journals and Reviews

Blast It All: Allen Charges and the Dangers of Playing With
Dynamite. 32 UH L. Rev. 323 (2010).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next